Ohio, session 136, HB274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 9.51 and 9.511 of the Revised 7
Code be enacted to read as follows: 8
Sec. 9.51. (A) Each municipal corporation shall provide i n 9
the municipal corporation, and each township shall provide in 10
the unincorporated territory of the township, the following 11
services: 12
(1) Fire-fighting services; 13
(2) Emergency medical services. 14
(B) The services required under division (A) of this 15
section shall be provided using one or more of the following 16
methods: 17
(1) Directly by the township or municipal corporation via 18

H. B. No. 274 Page 2
As Introduced
authority granted in the Ohio Constitution or another section of 19
the Revised Code; 20
(2) Via district or joint district under authority granted 21
in another section of the Revised Code; 22
(3) Via contract under authority granted in another 23
section of the Revised Code; 24
(4) Via other authority granted in another section of the 25
Revised Code. 26
(C) This section does not grant general authority to 27
provide the services listed in division (A) of this section. 28
Sec. 9.511. (A) As used in this section : 29
(1) "Eligible expense" means any expense related to the 30
following: 31
(a) Joining a district, joint district, or regional 32
council of governments including related election expenses, or 33
entering into a contract as specified under division (C)(1), 34
(2), or (3) of this section; 35
(b) Equipment, training, or personnel related to the 36
provision of an eligible service incurred by the township or 37
municipal corporation within one year after joining a district, 38
joint district, or regional council of governments or entering 39
into a contract as specified under division (C)(1), (2), or (3) 40
of this section. 41
(2) "Eligible service" means either of the following: 42
(a) Firefighting services; 43
(b) Emergency medical services. 44
(B) The fire and emergency medical shared services 45

H. B. No. 274 Page 3
As Introduced
reimbursement grant program is created. The state fire marshal 46
shall administer the program, under which the state fire marshal 47
shall provide grants to eligible townships and municipal 48
corporations to reimburse eligible expenses. 49
(C) A township or municipal corporation is eligible to 50
receive a grant under the program if, on or after the effective 51
date of this section, the township or municipal corporation does 52
any of the following for the purpose of providing one or more 53
eligible services: 54
(1) Joins a newly created district, joint district, or 55
regional council of governments; 56
(2) Joins an existing district, joint district, or 57
regional council of governments; 58
(3) Enters into a new contract, not substantially similar 59
to an existing or recently expired contract, with another 60
governmental entity. 61
(D) Not less than one year after the township or municipal 62
corporation joins a district, joint district, or regional 63
council of governments or enters into a contract as specified 64
under division (C)(1), (2), or (3) of this section, but not more 65
than two years thereafter, a township or municipal corporation 66
may apply for reimbursement under the grant program in the 67
manner prescribed by the state fire marshal. Subject to the 68
availability of funds, the state fire marshal shall reimburse 69
fifty per cent of the eligible expenses, up to one hundred 70
thousand dollars. A township or municipal corporation shall not 71
receive more than one reimbursement under the program. 72
Section 2. Section 1 of this act takes effect January 1, 73
2026. 74